src/scripts/Georgian/downcase.foma
# Copyright (C) 2013  Beqa Gozalishvili <beqaprogger@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Downcase 
ა -> ა || _ ,, 
ბ -> ბ || _ ,, 
გ -> გ || _ ,, 
დ -> დ || _ ,, 
ე -> ე || _ ,, 
ვ -> ვ || _ ,, 
ზ -> ზ || _ ,, 
თ -> თ || _ ,, 
ი -> ი || _ ,, 
კ -> კ || _ ,, 
ლ -> ლ || _ ,, 
მ -> მ || _ ,, 
ნ -> ნ || _ ,, 
ო -> ო || _ ,, 
პ -> პ || _ ,, 
ჟ -> ჟ || _ ,, 
რ -> რ || _ ,, 
ს -> ს || _ ,, 
ტ -> ტ || _ ,, 
უ -> უ || _ ,, 
ფ -> ფ || _ ,, 
ქ -> ქ || _ ,, 
ღ -> ღ || _ ,, 
ყ -> ყ || _ ,, 
შ -> შ || _ ,, 
ჩ -> ჩ || _ ,, 
ც -> ც || _ ,, 
ძ -> ძ || _ ,, 
წ -> წ || _ ,, 
ჭ -> ჭ || _ ,, 
ხ -> ხ || _ ,, 
ჯ -> ჯ || _ ,, 
ჰ -> ჰ || _ ,, 
A -> a || _ ,, 
B -> b || _ ,, 
C -> c || _ ,, 
D -> d || _ ,, 
E -> e || _ ,, 
F -> f || _ ,, 
G -> g || _ ,, 
H -> h || _ ,, 
I -> i || _ ,, 
J -> j || _ ,, 
K -> k || _ ,, 
L -> l || _ ,, 
M -> m || _ ,, 
N -> n || _ ,, 
O -> o || _ ,, 
P -> p || _ ,, 
Q -> q || _ ,, 
R -> r || _ ,, 
S -> s || _ ,, 
T -> t || _ ,, 
U -> u || _ ,, 
V -> v || _ ,, 
W -> w || _ ,, 
X -> x || _ ,, 
Y -> y || _ ,, 
Z -> z || _ ; 

regex 
Downcase ; 
